Georgia, session 2025_26, HB883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 883
- 1 -

25 LC 39 4540
14 SECTION 1.
15 Article 8A of Chapter 1 of Title 10 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
16 electric vehicle charging stations, is amended by revising Code Section 10-1-222, relating
17 to charging stations to be capable of measuring and displaying amount of electricity
18 delivered and annual registration, as follows:
19 "10-1-222.
20 (a)(1)(A) All electric vehicle charging stations that deliver electricity to a consumer for
21 consideration of payment shall be capable of accurately measuring and prominently
22 displaying the amount of electricity delivered to each electric vehicle on a per
23 kilowatt-hour basis, either directly upon the station or remotely through the use of a
24 digital network. Such stations shall be further equipped with meters to record the total
25 kilowatt-hours dispensed.
26 (B) All electric vehicle charging stations installed for operation on or after January 1,
27 2026, shall be capable of accurately measuring and prominently displaying the amount
28 of electricity delivered to each electric vehicle on a per kilowatt-hour basis, either
29 directly upon the station or remotely through the use of a digital network. Such stations
30 shall be further equipped with meters to record the total kilowatt-hours dispensed.
31 (2) All electric vehicle charging stations that deliver electricity by alternating current and
32 for no consideration of payment in operation prior to January 1, 2026, shall be capable
33 of prominently displaying when the maximum needed amount of electricity has been
34 delivered to an electric vehicle, either directly upon the station or remotely through the
35 use of a digital network.
36 (b) All electric vehicle charging stations shall be subject to inspection as provided for in
37 this article. Prior to operation of any electric vehicle charging station and annually
38 thereafter, an electric vehicle charging provider shall register with the Commissioner in the
39 form and manner prescribed by such Commissioner. Such registration shall include the:
40 (1) The location of the electric vehicle charging station;
H. B. 883
- 2 -

25 LC 39 4540
41 (2) Whether the electricity to be provided will be in exchange for consideration of
42 payment;
43 (3) The date of first operation of the electric vehicle charging station;
44 (4) The the name, brand, or manufacturer of the type of electric vehicle charging station,
45 together with the name and address thereof; and
46 (5) Certification certification that the electric vehicle charging station is in conformity
47 with the specifications established pursuant to this article by the Commissioner.
48 (c) Upon compliance with the requirements of this Code section, a certificate of
49 registration shall be issued:
50 (1) For an electric vehicle charging station described in paragraph (1) of subsection (a)
51 of this Code section, upon payment of an annual registration fee of $250.00; or
52 (2) For an electric vehicle charging station described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a)
53 of this Code section, upon payment of an annual registration fee of $50.00.
54 (d) Certificates of registration issued by the Commissioner pursuant to this Code section
55 shall be posted in a prominent and accessible place upon the electric vehicle charging
56 station."
57 SECTION 2.
58 Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 10-1-224, relating to inspection of
59 stations, accurate stations, seal of accurate stations, condemnation of inaccurate stations,
60 secrete manipulation prohibited, and regulatory authority, as follows:
61 "10-1-224.
62 (a) Electric vehicle charging station inspectors shall inspect all electric vehicle charging
63 stations located in the territory assigned to them.
64 (b) All electric vehicle charging stations that deliver electricity to a consumer for
65 consideration of payment found to be giving accurate measure of the amount of electricity
66 delivered within the tolerance established by regulations of the Commissioner shall have
H. B. 883
- 3 -

25 LC 39 4540
67 the electric vehicle charging station sealed with an official seal applied by an inspector duly
68 authorized by the Commissioner.
69 (c)(1) If any electric vehicle charging station that delivers electricity to a consumer for
70 consideration of payment shall be found to be giving inaccurate measure of the amount
71 of electricity delivered in excess of the tolerance established by regulations of the
72 Commissioner, the inspector shall then and there immediately notify the electric vehicle
73 charging provider, whether owner or lessee. Should the electric vehicle charging
74 provider in receipt of notice pursuant to this paragraph fail or refuse to then and there
75 immediately make such adjustments as shall be necessary to bring the measure within the
76 allowed variation, the same Commissioner shall be authorized to apply to the superior
77 court having jurisdiction over the electric vehicle charging provider for an injunction
78 against the continuance of any such violations. The appropriate superior court shall have
79 jurisdiction, upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant such temporary or permanent
80 injunction restraining further violations as the circumstances appear to require.
81 (2) If any electric vehicle charging station shall be found to be in unsafe condition
82 pursuant to standards established by regulations of the Commissioner, the inspector shall
83 immediately notify the electric vehicle charging provider, whether owner or lessee.
84 Should the electric vehicle charging provider in receipt of notice pursuant to this
85 paragraph fail or refuse to immediately make such adjustments as shall be necessary to
86 bring the electric vehicle charging station into compliance with safety rules or regulations
87 such electric vehicle charging station shall be condemned and rendered inoperable
88 immediately by the examining inspector examining the same; and such electric vehicle
89 charging station shall not again be operated without the written consent of the
90 Commissioner. Inspectors shall be required to report to the Commissioner immediately
91 the name and number of any electric vehicle charging station condemned and rendered
92 inoperable pursuant to this paragraph.
H. B. 883
- 4 -

25 LC 39 4540
93 (d) When any electric vehicle charging station is condemned under this article
94 paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Code section by any inspector, it shall be the duty
95 of the inspector immediately to make affidavit before the judge of the probate court of the
96 county in which the electric vehicle charging station is located that such station is being
97 operated contrary to law by the electric vehicle charging provider who shall be named in
98 the affidavit. Thereupon the judge of the probate court shall issue an order to the electric
99 vehicle charging provider named in the affidavit to show cause before him or her on the
100 day named in the order, not more than ten days nor fewer than three days from the issuance
101 of the order, why the electric vehicle charging station should not be forfeited, confiscated
102 to the state, and dismantled. On such day named in the order, it shall be the duty of the
103 judge of the probate court to hear the respective parties and to determine whether or not the
104 electric vehicle charging station has been operated contrary to the provisions of this article.
105 If the judge of the probate court finds that the electric vehicle charging station has been so
106 operated, he or she shall forthwith issue an order adjudging the electric vehicle charging
107 station to be forfeited and confiscated to the state and directing the sheriff of the county to
108 dismantle the electric vehicle charging station and take it into his or her possession, and,
109 after ten days' notice by posting or publication, as the court may direct, to sell the electric
110 vehicle charging station to the highest bidder for cash. The proceeds of sale, or as much
111 thereof as may be necessary, shall be used by the sheriff, first, to pay the costs associated
112 with sale, which shall be the same as in cases of attachment, and the sheriff shall thereupon
113 pay over and deliver the residue, if any, to the person from whose possession the electric
114 vehicle charging station has been taken.
115 (e) It shall be unlawful to install or operate any electric vehicle charging station which can
116 be secretly manipulated in such manner as to give short measure. Such inaccurate or that
117 is in violation of any rule or regulation of the Commissioner relating to safe operation of
118 electric vehicle charging stations. An unsafe electric vehicle charging station shall be
119 condemned as provided in this Code section, and thereafter it shall be unlawful for any
H. B. 883
- 5 -

25 LC 39 4540
120 person to resell dispense any electricity from such electric vehicle charging station until
121 such station has been made or altered to comply with this article and has been inspected
122 and approved for service by the inspector.
123 (f) It shall be unlawful for anyone to remove a seal applied by an inspector to an electric
124 vehicle charging station without first securing consent of the Commissioner, whose consent
125 may be given through one of the duly authorized inspectors.
126 (g) The department shall have the power to implement rules and regulations necessary to
127 carry out the inspections of electric vehicle charging stations as provided for by this Code
128 section."
129 SECTION 3.
130 Article 1 of Chapter 9 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
131 motor fuel tax, is amended in Code Section 48-9-2, relating to definitions relative to motor
132 fuel tax, by revising subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) as follows:
133 "(G) Consumes, uses, or sells electricity as a motor fuel through an electric vehicle
134 charging station for both highway and nonhighway use; provided, however, that such
135 term shall not include any electric vehicle charging stations that deliver electricity by
136 alternating current and for no consideration of payment in operation prior to January 1,
137 2026;"
138 SECTION 4.
139 Said article is further amended in Code Section 48-9-3, relating to levy of excise tax, rate,
140 taxation of motor fuels not commonly sold or measured by gallon, rate, prohibition of tax on
141 motor fuel by political subdivisions, exception, and exempted sales, by revising
142 paragraph (2) of subsection (a) and subdivision (b)(7)(B)(ii)(I) as follows:
143 "(2) In the event any motor fuels which are not commonly sold or measured by the gallon
144 or which are not otherwise provided for by this Code section are used in any motor
H. B. 883
- 6 -

25 LC 39 4540
145 vehicles on the public highways of this state, the commissioner may assess, levy, and
146 collect a tax upon such fuels, under such regulations as the commissioner may
147 promulgate, in accordance with and measured by the nearest power potential equivalent
148 to that of one gallon of regular grade gasoline; provided, however, that no tax shall be
149 collected upon such fuel dispensed from an electric vehicle charging station that delivers
150 electricity by alternating current and for which no consideration of payment is exchanged
151 that is in operation prior to January 1, 2026. Any determination by the commissioner of
152 the power potential equivalent of such motor fuels shall be prima-facie correct. Upon
153 each such quantity of such fuels used upon the public highways of this state, a tax at the
154 same rate per gallon imposed on motor fuel under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
155 be assessed and collected."
156 "(ii)(I) Any special fuel sold by a distributor to a purchaser who has a storage
157 receptacle which has a connection to a withdrawal outlet that may be used for
158 highway use, as defined in paragraph (8) of Code Section 48-9-2, and any special
159 fuel delivered from an electric vehicle charging station, is not exempt from the
160 motor fuel and road taxes imposed by this article unless: (1) the purchaser is at the
161 time of sale a valid licensed distributor of that type of motor fuel, or (2) such fuel
162 dispensed is from an electric vehicle charging station that delivers electricity by
163 alternating current and for which no consideration of payment is exchanged that is
164 in operation prior to January 1, 2026, or an exemption certificate has been obtained
165 on forms furnished by the Department of Revenue showing that there is no highway
166 use of such fuels and the person obtaining such fuel is not a reseller of such fuels.
167 Each exemption certificate shall be valid for a period of not more than three years
168 and shall be kept by the distributor as one of the records specified in Code Section
169 48-9-8. It shall be the responsibility of the purchaser to notify the distributor when
170 the purchaser is no longer qualified for the nonhighway exemption. All applicable
H. B. 883
- 7 -

25 LC 39 4540
171 taxes must shall be charged the purchaser until the purchaser is granted a valid
172 distributor's license for that type of motor fuel."
173 SECTION 5.
174 This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
175 SECTION 6.
176 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 883
- 8 -